zh-CN: 坡道类型: 斜坡道; 碗池坡道; 落地坡道; 飞箱; 趣味盒; 磨边台; 半管; 起跳台; 起跳坡道; 石台; 手摇平台; 迷你半管; 金字塔; 四分之一管; 栏杆; 蛇形滑道; 脊梁坡道; 跃升坡道; 垂直坡道; 顺墙滑行; 其他
da: Rampetype: Bankrampe; Skål; Drop-in-rampe; Fluekasse; Sjov kasse; Slibekasse; Halvt rør; Kicker-rampe; Startrampe; Afsats; Manuel pude; Minirampe; Pyramide; Kvart rør; Skinne; Snake run; Spine-rampe; Step-up-rampe; Lodret rampe; Vægtur; Andet
lt-LT: Rampos rūšis: Užvažiavimo-nuvažiavimo rampa; Arena; „Drop-in“ rampa su platforma; „Fly box“ A formos čiuožimo botas; „Fun box“ rampa; „Grind box“ rampa; Pusvamzdis; Užvažiavimo-nuvažiavimo pusrampė; Atviro šuolio pusrampė; Čiuožimo turėklas; „Manual pad“ balansinis padas; Mini rampa; Piramidė; Ketvirtinis vamzdis; Skersiniai; „Snake run“ rampa; Dviguba pusrampa; Laiptuota rampa; „Vert“ rampa; Horizontali sienelė; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta klančine: Za prag; Bazen; Spustna rampa; Skakalni kvader; Zabavni kvader; Drsalni kvader; Pol-pipa; Vzletalna rampa; Izstrelitvena rampa; Polica; Nizka polica; Mini rampa; Piramida; Četrt-pipa; Klančina; Kačji tek; Šotor; Stopničasta rampa; Vertikalna rampa; Stenska; Drugo
cs: Typ rampy: Bank ramp; Bowl; Drop-in ramp; Fly box; Fun box; Grind box; Half-pipe; Kicker ramp; Launch ramp; Ledge; Manual pad; Mini-ramp; Pyramida; Quarter-pipe; Rail; Snake run; Spine ramp; Step-up ramp; Vert ramp; Wall ride; Jiné
de: Rampentyp: Bank Ramp; Bowl; Drop-In-Ramp; Flybox; Funbox; Grindbox; Halfpipe; Kicker Ramp; Launch Ramp; Ledge; Manual Pad; Mini-Ramp; Pyramide; Quarterpipe; Rail; Snake Run; Spine Ramp; Step-Up Ramp; Vert Ramp; Wallride; Sonstiges
nb: Rampetype: Bankrampe; Bolle; Drop-in-rampe; Flyboks; Fun-boks; Grind-boks; Half-pipe; Kicker-rampe; Utskytningsrampe; Ledge; Manuell pad; Mini-rampe; Pyramide; Quarter-pipe; Rail; Snake run; Spine-rampe; Step-up-rampe; Vert-rampe; Wall ride; Annet
fr: Type de rampe: Rampe inclinée; Bol; Rampe de drop-in; Airbox; Table de saut; Grind; Demi-lune; Kicker incliné; Rampe de lancement; Ledge; Trottoir; Mini-rampe; Pyramide; Kicker courbé; Rail; Snake; Spine; Rampe; U; Mur; Autre
ru: Тип рампы: Приставной пандус; В форме чаши; Пандус для спуска; Флай бокс; Фан бокс; Гринд бокс; Хаф-пайп; Трамплин; Стартовая рампа; Выступ; Ручная рампа; Мини-рампа; Пирамида; Квотер-пайп; С рельсами; Змеевидная; Спайн-рамп; Подъемная рампа; Вертикальная рампа; Езда по стене; Другая
pt-PT: Tipo de rampa: Rampa de banco; Tigela; Rampa de entrada; Caixa de borboleta; Caixa de diversão; Caixa de moagem; Meio tubo; Rampa de arranque; Rampa de lançamento; Borda; Tapete manual; Minirrampa; Pirâmide; Quarto de tubo; Calha; Snake run; Rampa de coluna; Rampa de subida; Rampa vertical; Andar na parede; Outro
nl: Schanstype: Oeverhelling; Kom; Instaphelling; Fly box; Fun box; Grind box; Half-pipe; Kickerschans; Lanceerhelling; Richel; Handmatig kussen; Mini-ramp; Piramide; Kwartpijp; Rail; Snake run; Wervelkolomhelling; Step-up ramp; Verticale helling; Wall ride; Andere
zh-TW: 坡道類型: 滑板坡道; 碗; 落入式坡道; 跳台; 跳台組; 磨箱; 半管; 踢腳坡道; 發射坡道; 壁架; 平台; 迷你坡道; 金字塔; 四分之一管; 欄杆; 蛇形坡道; 脊坡; 踏高坡道; 垂直坡道; 騎牆; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de rampa: Rampa bank; Bowl; Rampa portátil; Fly box; Fun box; Grind box; Half-pipe; Rampa kicker; Rampa de lançamento; Borda; Pad manual; Minirrampa; Pirâmide; Quarter-pipe; Trilho; Snake run; Rampa spine; Rampa step-up; Rampa vertical; Parede; Outro
ko: 램프 유형: 은행 램프; 그릇; 매립형 램프; 플라이박스; 펀박스; 그라인드 박스; 하프 파이프; 키커 램프; 발사대; 선반; 수동 패드; 미니 램프; 피라미드; 쿼터파이프; 레일; 스네이크 런; 스파인 램프; 스텝업 램프; 수직 램프; 벽타기; 기타
pl: Typ rampy: Rampa brzegowa; Miska; Rampa wjazdowa; Fly box; Fun box; Grind box; Half-pipe; Kicker ramp; Launch ramp; Półka; Podkładka ręczna; Mini rampa; Piramida; Quarter-pipe; Kolej; Snake run; Spine ramp; Step-up ramp; Vert ramp; Wall ride; Inne
sv: Ramptyp: Bankramp; Skål; Drop-in-ramp; Fly box; Fun box; Grind box; Halfpipe; Kicker ramp; Startramp; Avsats; Manny pad; Miniramp; Pyramid; Quarter-pipe; Räcke; Snake run; Spine ramp; Step-up ramp; Vert ramp; Wall ride; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta rampe: Bank rampa; Bowl; Ulazna rampa; Kutija za mušice; Fun box; Grind box; Half-pipe; Kicker rampa; Lansirna rampa; Ledge; Ručna; Minirampa; Piramida; Quarter-pipe; Ograda; Snake run; Spine rampa; Step-up rampa; Vert rampa; Vožnja zidom; Ostalo
fi: Ramppityyppi: Bank -ramppi; Bowl; Drop-in -ramppi; Fly box; Fun box; Grind box; Half-pipe; Kicker -ramppi; Launch -ramppi; Ledge; Manual pad; Mini-ramppi; Pyramid; Quarter-pipe; Rail; Snake run; Spine -ramppi; Step-up -ramppi; Vert -ramppi; Wall ride; Muu
es: Tipo de rampa: Rampa de banco; Tazón; Rampa de caída; Caja de moscas; Caja de diversión; Caja de molienda; Medio tubo; Rampa de lanzamiento; Rampa de lanzamiento; Plataforma; Plataforma manual; Minirampa; Pirámide; Cuarto de tubo; Riel; Carrera de serpientes; Rampa de columna; Rampa de subida; Rampa vertical; Pared para deslizar; Otros
vi: Loại đường dốc trượt: Dốc nghiêng; Bán cầu trượt; Dốc thả; Hộp bay; Hộp vui; Hộp trượt; Bán máng; Bệ nhảy; Bệ nhảy xa; Dốc cạnh; Dốc tập trượt; Dốc nhỏ; Kim tự tháp; Bệ trượt chữ U; Dốc trượt có thanh trượt; Dốc trượt ống lượn; Dốc trượt hình xương sống; Dốc lên; Dốc trượt thẳng đứng; Dốc trượt tường; Khác
el: Τύπος ράμπας: Ράμπα τράπεζας; Λεκάνη; Ράμπα πτώσης; Fly box; Fun box; Grind box; Μισή εξέδρα; Ράμπα Kicker; Ράμπα εκτόξευσης; Περβάζι; Χειροκίνητο μαξιλάρι; Μίνι ράμπα; Πυραμίδα; Εξέδρα ενός τετάρτου; Κιγκλίδωμα; Snake run; Ράμπα Spine; Ανοδική ράμπα; Ράμπα Vert; Διαδρομή τοίχου; Άλλο
tr: Rampa Tipi: Banka rampası; Kase; İniş rampası; Uçuş kutusu; Eğlence kutusu; Sürtme kutusu; Yarım boru; Tekme rampası; Sıçrama rampası; Kenar; Manuel ped; Mini rampa; Piramit; Çeyrek boru; Tırabzan; Yılan koşusu; Omurga rampası; Yükseltme rampası; Dikey rampa; Duvar sürüşü; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип рампа: Bank ramp; Bowl; Рампа за вграждане; Fly box; Fun box; Grind box; Half-pipe; Kicker ramp; Launch ramp; Ledge; Ръчна подложка; Мини-рампа; Пирамида; Четвърт пайп; Рейл; Snake run; Spine рампа; Step-up рампа; Верт рампа; Wall ride; Други
sk-SK: Typ rampy: Banková rampa; Misa; Nástupná rampa; Muškárska krabička; Zábavná krabička; Brúsny box; U-rampa; Nájazdová rampa; Štartovacia rampa; Rímsa; Manuálna podložka; Mini-rampa; Pyramída; Štvrtinová rampa; Koľajnica; Pumptrack; Chrbticová rampa; Nájazdová rampa; Vertikálna rampa; Jazda na stene; Iné
en: Ramp type: Bank ramp; Bowl; Drop-in ramp; Fly box; Fun box; Grind box; Half-pipe; Kicker ramp; Launch ramp; Ledge; Manual pad; Mini-ramp; Pyramid; Quarter-pipe; Rail; Snake run; Spine ramp; Step-up ramp; Vert ramp; Wall ride; Other
hu: Rámpa típusa: Sánc; Medence; Ugrató rámpa; Fly box; Fun box; Grind box; Félcső; Kicker rámpa; Indítórámpa; Perem; Kézi pad; Minirámpa; Piramis; Negyedcső; Korlát; Snake run; Gerincrámpa; Fellépő rámpa; Vertikális rámpa; Wall ride; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tip rampă: Rampă bank; Bowl; Rampă drop-in; Fly box; Fun box; Grind box; Half-pipe; Rampă kicker; Rampă de lansare; Ledge; Manual pad; Mini-rampă; Pyramid; Quarter-pipe; Rail; Snake run; Rampă spine; Rampă step-up; Rampă vert; Wall ride; Altele
th: ประเภททางลาด: ทางลาดแบบแบงค์; ชาม; ทางลาดแบบดรอปอิน; ฟลายบ็อกซ์; ฟันบ็อกซ์; กล่องบด; ฮาล์ฟไปป์; ทางลาดคิกเกอร์; ทางลาดปล่อยตัว; แนวยื่น; แมนนวลแพด; ทางลาดขนาดเล็ก; พีระมิด; ควอเตอร์ไปป์; ราง; สเนครัน; ทางลาดแบบสูงตรงกลาง; ทางลาดขั้นบันได; ทางลาดแบบโค้งรอบข้าง; กำแพงสำหรับไต่; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di rampa: Bank ramp; Bowl; Rampa drop in; Fly box; Fun box; Grind box; Half-pipe; Rampa kicker; Rampa di lancio; Ledge; Pad manuale; Mini-rampa; Piramide; Quarter-pipe; Rail; Snake run; Rampa Spine; Rampa Step-up; Rampa verticale; Wall ride; Altro
ja: ランプタイプ: バンクランプ; ボウル; ドロップインランプ; フライボックス; ファンボックス; グラインドボックス; ハーフパイプ; キッカーランプ; ローンチランプ; レッジ; マニュアルパッド; ミニスランプ; ピラミッド; クォーターパイプ; レール; スネークラン; スパインランプ; ステップアップランプ; ヴァートランプ; ウォールライド; その他